zh-TW: 醫師玩具組角色扮演情境: 救護車/緊急醫療服務; 牙醫; 眼科醫師/驗光師; 急救; 一般醫師/診所; 醫院; 醫學實驗室; 護理師; 藥局; 外科/手術室; 獸醫; 其他
hu: Orvosos játékkészlet szerepjáték meghatározás: Mentőautó/Mentőszolgálat; Fogorvos; Szemorvos/optometrista; Elsősegély; Háziorvos/rendelő; Kórház; Orvosi laboratórium; Ápoló; Gyógyszertár; Sebészet/Műtő; Állatorvos; Egyéb
pt-PT: Doctor playset função-play Definições: Ambulância/emergência médica; Dentista; Oftalmologista/optometrista; Primeiros socorros; Clínica geral/clínica; Hospital; Laboratório médico; Enfermeiro(a); Farmácia; Cirurgia/bloco operatório; Veterinário; Outro
el: Ρύθμιση σετ παιχνιδιού γιατρού: Ασθενοφόρο/Διάσωση; Οδοντίατρος; Οφθαλμίατρος/Οπτομέτρης; Πρώτες βοήθειες; Γενικός ιατρός/Κλινική; Νοσοκομείο; Ιατρικό εργαστήριο; Νοσοκόμος/α; Φαρμακείο; Χειρουργείο; Κτηνίατρος; Άλλο
tr: Doktor oyun seti rol oynama ayarları: Ambulans/acil servis; Diş hekimi; Göz doktoru/optometrist; İlk yardım; Genel doktor/klinik; Hastane; Tıbbi laboratuvar; Hemşire; Eczane; Cerrahi/ameliyathane; Veteriner; Diğer
it: Dottore playset gioco di ruolo Impostazioni: Ambulanza/pronto soccorso; Dentista; Oculista/optometrista; Primo soccorso; Medico generico/ambulatorio; Ospedale; Laboratorio medico; Infermiere; Farmacia; Chirurgia/sala operatoria; Veterinario; Altro
vi: Bộ đồ chơi nhập vai bác sĩ: Xe cứu thương/Cấp cứu; Nha sĩ; Bác sĩ mắt/chuyên viên khúc xạ nhãn khoa; Sơ cứu; Bác sĩ đa khoa/phòng khám; Bệnh viện; Phòng xét nghiệm y khoa; Y tá; Nhà thuốc; Phẫu thuật/phòng mổ; Bác sĩ thú y; Khác
lt-LT: Gydytojo žaidimų rinkinio vaidmenų žaidimo aplinka: Greitoji pagalba / GMP; Stomatologas; Akių gydytojas / optometristas; Pirmoji pagalba; Bendrosios praktikos gydytojas / klinika; Ligoninė; Medicinos laboratorija; Slaugytojas; Vaistinė; Chirurgija / operacinė; Veterinaras; Kita
hr-HR: Doktor igraonica s postavkama za igranje uloga: Hitna pomoć / hitna služba; Zubar; Oftalmolog/optometrist; Prva pomoć; Liječnik opće prakse / klinika; Bolnica; Medicinski laboratorij; Medicinska sestra / tehničar; Ljekarna; Kirurgija/operacijska sala; Veterinar; Ostalo
es: Configuración del juego de rol del juego de doctor: Ambulancia/SME; Dentista; Oculista/optometrista; Primeros auxilios; Médico general/clínica; Hospital; Laboratorio médico; Enfermería; Farmacia; Cirugía/quirófano; Veterinaria; Otro
sv: Doktor lekset roll-play Inställningar: Ambulans/räddningstjänst; Tandläkare; Ögonläkare/optiker; Första hjälpen; Allmänläkare/klinik; Sjukhus; Medicinskt labb; Sjuksköterska; Apotek; Kirurgi/operationssal; Veterinär; Övrigt
da: Rollespilsmiljø til lægesæt: Ambulance/redningstjeneste; Tandlæge; Øjenlæge/optiker; Førstehjælp; Alment praktiserende læge/klinik; Hospital; Medicinsk laboratorium; Sygeplejerske; Apotek; Kirurgi/operationsstue; Dyrlæge; Andet
fr: Contexte de jeu de rôle du coffret docteur: Ambulance/Urgences; Dentiste; Ophtalmologue/optométriste; Premiers secours; Médecin généraliste/clinique; Hôpital; Laboratoire médical; Infirmier/infirmière; Pharmacie; Chirurgie/bloc opératoire; Vétérinaire; Autre
nl: Doktersset rollenspel setting: Ambulance/EHBO; Tandarts; Oogarts/optometrist; EHBO; Huisarts/kliniek; Ziekenhuis; Medisch lab; Verpleegkundige; Apotheek; Chirurgie/operatiekamer; Dierenarts; Overig
ko: 의사 놀이 세트 역할놀이 환경: 구급차/응급구조(EMS); 치과; 안과/검안사; 응급 처치; 일반의/클리닉; 병원; 의학 실험실; 간호사; 약국; 수술/수술실; 수의사; 기타
nb: Lege lekesett rollespillinnstillinger: Ambulanse/akuttmedisin; Tannlege; Øyelege/optiker; Førstehjelp; Allmennlege/klinikk; Sykehus; Medisinsk laboratorium; Sykepleier; Apotek; Kirurgi/operasjonsstue; Veterinær; Annet
fi: Lääkärileikkisetin ensisijainen roolileikkitarkoitus: Ambulanssi/Ensihoito; Hammaslääkäri; Silmälääkäri/Optikko; Ensiapu; Yleislääkäri/Klinikka; Sairaala; Lääketieteellinen laboratorio; Sairaanhoitaja; Apteekki; Kirurgia/Leikkaussali; Eläinlääkäri; Muu
sk-SK: Prostredie rolovej hry pre lekárov v hracej súprave: Sanitka/Záchranná služba; Zubár; Očný lekár/optometrista; Prvá pomoc; Všeobecný lekár/klinika; Nemocnica; Lekárske laboratórium; Zdravotná sestra; Lekáreň; Chirurgia/operačná sála; Veterinár; Iné
sl-SI: Igralni komplet Zdravnik vloga-play Nastavitve: Reševalno vozilo/nujna medicinska pomoč; Zobozdravnik; Očesni zdravnik/optometrist; Prva pomoč; Splošni zdravnik/klinika; Bolnišnica; Medicinski laboratorij; Medicinska sestra; Lekarna; Kirurgija/operacijska dvorana; Veterinar; Drugo
cs: Scénář hraní rolí doktorské herní sady: Sanitka / záchranná služba; Zubař; Oční lékař / optometrista; První pomoc; Praktický lékař / poliklinika; Nemocnice; Lékařská laboratoř; Zdravotní sestra; Lékárna; Chirurgie / operační sál; Veterinář; Ostatní
ru: Набор для игр «Доктор»: Скорая помощь/МЧС; Дантист; Окулист/оптометрист; Первая помощь; Терапевт/поликлиника; Больница; Медицинская лаборатория; Медсестра; Аптека; Хирургия/операционная; Ветеринар; Другое
bg-BG: Сценарий за ролева игра с лекарски комплект: Линейка/спешна помощ; Зъболекар; Очен лекар/оптометрист; Първа помощ; Общопрактикуващ лекар/клиника; Болница; Медицинска лаборатория; Медицинска сестра; Аптека; Хирургия/операционна зала; Ветеринар; Друго
th: บริบทหรือสถานการณ์จำลองสำหรับการเล่นบทบาทสมมติในชุดของเล่นคุณหมอ: รถพยาบาล/หน่วยกู้ชีพ (EMS); ทันตแพทย์; จักษุแพทย์/นักทัศนมาตร; ปฐมพยาบาล; แพทย์ทั่วไป/คลินิก; โรงพยาบาล; ห้องแล็บการแพทย์; พยาบาล; ร้านขายยา; ศัลยกรรม/ห้องผ่าตัด; สัตวแพทย์; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Cenário de brincadeira do conjunto de médico: Ambulância/Socorristas; Dentista; Oftalmologista/optometrista; Primeiros socorros; Médico geral/clínica; Hospital; Laboratório médico; Enfermagem; Farmácia; Cirurgia/sala de cirurgia; Veterinário; Outro
de: Rollenspielthema des Doktorspielsets: Krankenwagen/Rettungsdienst; Zahnarzt/Zahnärztin; Augenheilkunde/Optometrie; Erste Hilfe; Allgemeinmedizin/Klinik; Krankenhaus; Medizinisches Labor; Pflegefachkraft; Apotheke; Chirurgie/OP-Saal; Tierarztpraxis; Sonstige
en: Doctor playset role-play setting: Ambulance/EMS; Dentist; Eye doctor/optometrist; First aid; General doctor/clinic; Hospital; Medical lab; Nurse; Pharmacy; Surgery/operating room; Veterinarian; Other
pl: Sceneria zabawy w lekarza: Karetka / pogotowie; Dentysta; Okulista; Pierwsza pomoc; Lekarz ogólny / przychodnia; Szpital; Laboratorium medyczne; Pielęgniarka; Apteka; Sala operacyjna / chirurgia; Weterynarz; Inne
ja: ドクターごっこ役割遊び設定: 救急車/救急隊; 歯医者; 眼科医/検眼医; 応急処置; 一般診療所/クリニック; 病院; 医療検査室; 看護師; 薬局; 外科/手術室; 獣医; その他
ro-RO: Setare joc de rol pentru setul de joacă cu doctori: Ambulanță/servicii de urgență; Dentist; Oftalmolog/optometrist; Prim ajutor; Medic generalist/clinică; Spital; Laborator medical; Asistentă/asistent; Farmacie; Chirurgie/sală de operații; Veterinar; Altele
zh-CN: 医生玩具套装角色扮演场景设定: 救护车/急救中心; 牙医; 眼科医生/验光师; 急救; 全科医生/诊所; 医院; 医学实验室; 护士; 药房; 外科手术室; 兽医; 其他